Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.005, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1d. new text end new text begin Active ingredient. new text end new text begin "Active ingredient" means an ingredient present in a fertilizer, soil amendment, plant amendment, or beneficial substance that is a plant nutrient or a soil or plant amending ingredient. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.005, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15b. new text end new text begin Inert ingredient. new text end new text begin "Inert ingredient" means an ingredient that is not an active ingredient in a specialty fertilizer, soil amendment, plant amendment, or beneficial substance. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.211, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Guaranteed analysis of soil or plant amendmentnew text begin or beneficial substancenew text end . The guaranteed analysis of a soil amendment deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end plant amendmentnew text begin , or beneficial substancenew text end must be an accurate statement of composition including the percentages of each new text begin active new text end ingredient. If the product is a microbiological product, the number of viable microorganisms per milliliter for a liquid deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end the number of viable microorganisms per gramnew text begin , or any other acceptable unitsnew text end for a deleted text begin drydeleted text end product must also be listed. Sec. 4. new text begin [18C.217] SOIL AMENDMENT, PLANT AMENDMENT, AND BENEFICIAL SUBSTANCE LABELING. new text end new text begin (a) A person may not sell or distribute a soil amendment, plant amendment, or beneficial substance in bags or other containers in this state unless a label is placed on or affixed to the bag or container stating in a clear, legible, and conspicuous form the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the product name; new text end new text begin (2) the net weight or net volume expressed in imperial and metric measurements; new text end new text begin (3) the name and address of the guarantor and registrant; new text end new text begin (4) a statement identifying the purpose of the product; new text end new text begin (5) directions for use; and new text end new text begin (6) the guaranteed analysis of each active ingredient. new text end new text begin (b) If the soil amendment, plant amendment, or beneficial substance contains mircroorganisms, the label must include an expiration date and recommended storage conditions. new text end new text begin (c) The label is not required to list inert ingredients. new text end new text begin (d) A person selling or distributing a bulk shipment of soil amendments, plant amendments, or beneficial substances to a singular, end consumer may provide the purchaser with a single printed form with the information required in paragraphs (a) and (b) instead of placing or affixing a label on the bulk bag or container. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.411, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Application. The application for registration must include: (1) for specialty fertilizers: (i) the name and address of the guarantor and registrant; (ii) the brand and grade; (iii) the guaranteed analysis as required by section 18C.211; (iv) the sources from which nitrogen, phosphorus, potassium, or other elements or materials are derived; and (v) the amount and formulas of inert ingredients; and (2) for soil amendments and plant amendments: (i) the name and address of the guarantor and registrant; (ii) the brand name; (iii) the sources from which the ingredients used in the product are derived; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (iv) the guaranteed analysis as required by section 18C.211deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (v) a certificate of composition that describes the amount and formulas of each inert ingredient and beneficial substance included in the formula. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must renumber the subdivisions in Minnesota Statutes, section 18C.005, in alphabetical order and correct all cross-references. new text end